test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k30_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    fótur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: fótur
    fótur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: fót
    fótur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: fóti
    fótur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: fótar
    fótur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: føtur
    fótur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: føtur
    fótur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: fótum
    fótur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: fóta
    fótur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: fóturin
    fótur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: fótin
    fótur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: fótinum
    fótur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: fótarins
    fótur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: føturnir
    fótur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: føturnar
    fótur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: fótunum
    fótur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: fótanna
